Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-809
Actions; intervention; waiver of service; confession of judgment; power of city attorney.

The city attorney of a city of the metropolitan class shall have the power to:

(1) Intervene in any suit or proceeding when the rights of the city are involved or where the city is a proper party;

(2) Waive the issuance and service of summons and may enter a voluntary appearance when in the city attorney's opinion the interests of the city may require it; and

(3) Confess judgment, but only when authorized by the city council.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 9, p. 511;

C.S.1922, § 3717;

C.S.1929, § 14-809;

R.S.1943, § 14-809;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 230.

Nebraska private citizens cannot maintain action under Clayton Act for alleged injury to municipality arising from alleged Sherman Act violations. Cosentino v. Carver-Greenfield Corp., 433 F.2d 1274 (8th Cir. 1970).